Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 38.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1448
Membership on advisory council; no
effect on other office or position.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
membership on the advisory council to the Office of Violence Prevention shall
not disqualify any member from holding his or her office or position or cause
the forfeiture thereof.

Laws 2009, LB63, § 38.